Maryland, session 2025, HB1146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
10–1403.
(a) The Crisis Response System shall include:
(1) A crisis communication center STATE 9–8–8 SUICIDE AND CRISIS
LIFELINE in each jurisdiction or region to [provide]:
(i) [A] PROVIDE A single point of entry to the Crisis Response
System;
(ii) [Coordination] COORDINATE WITH THE NATIONAL 9–8–8
SUICIDE AND CRISIS LIFELINE TO PROVIDE THE FULL RANGE OF SERVICES
PROVIDED BY THE NATIONAL 9–8–8 SUICIDE AND CRISIS LIFELINE, INCLUDING:
1. SUPPORTIVE COUNSELING;
2. SUICIDE PREVENTION;
– 1 –

Ch. 659 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
3. CRISIS INTERVENTION; AND
4. REFERRALS TO ADDITIONAL RESOURCES; AND
5. DIRECT DISPATCH OR WARM HAND–OFFS TO MOBILE
CRISIS RESPONSE AND STABILIZATION SERVICES AND OTHER IMMEDIATE SERVICES
AS NEEDED;
(III) COORDINATE with the local core service agency or local
behavioral health authority, police, 3–1–1, 2–1–1, or other local mental health hotlines,
emergency medical service personnel, and behavioral health providers; and
[(iii)] (IV) [Programs] PROVIDE OTHER PROGRAMS that may
include:
1. A clinical crisis telephone line for suicide prevention and
crisis intervention;
2. A hotline for behavioral health information, referral, and
assistance;
3. Clinical crisis walk–in services, including:
A. Triage for initial assessment;
B. Crisis stabilization until additional services are available;
C. Linkage to treatment services and family and peer support
groups; and
D. Linkage to other health and human services programs;
4. Critical incident stress management teams, providing
disaster behavioral health services, critical incident stress management, and an on–call
system for these services;
5. Crisis residential beds to serve as an alternative to
hospitalization;
6. A community crisis bed and hospital bed registry,
including a daily tally of empty beds;
7. Transportation coordination, ensuring transportation of
patients to urgent appointments or to emergency psychiatric facilities;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 659
8. Mobile crisis teams;
9. 23–hour holding beds;
10. Emergency psychiatric services;
11. Urgent care capacity;
12. Expanded capacity for assertive community treatment;
13. Crisis intervention teams with capacity to respond in each
jurisdiction 24 hours a day and 7 days a week; and
14. Individualized family intervention teams;
(2) Community awareness promotion and training programs; and
(3) An evaluation of outcomes of services [through]:
(I) IN EACH JURISDICTION OR REGION, INCLUDING AN
EVALUATION OF:
1. 9–8–8 CALL, TEXT, AND CHAT VOLUME;
2. 9–8–8 LOCAL ANSWER RATE;
3. 9–8–8 CALL, TEXT, AND CHAT RESOLUTION DATA,
INCLUDING:
A. THE PROPORTION OF CRISES RESOLVED BY PHONE;
B. THE PROPORTION OF CRISES RESOLVED THROUGH
MOBILE CRISIS TEAM DISPATCH; AND
C. THE PROPORTION OF CRISES RESOLVED BY
TRANSFER TO 9–1–1;
4. MOBILE CRISIS TEAM DISPATCH VOLUME;
5. MOBILE CRISIS TEAM RESPONSE TIME;
6. MOBILE CRISIS TEAM DISPATCH RESOLUTION DATA,
INCLUDING:
– 3 –

Ch. 659 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
A. THE PROPORTION OF CRISES RESOLVED SAFELY IN
THE COMMUNITY; AND
B. THE PROPORTION OF CRISES RESOLVED THROUGH
TRANSFER TO A HIGHER LEVEL OF CARE;
7. CRISIS STABILIZATION CENTER USAGE; AND
8. CRISIS STABILIZATION CENTER DISCHARGE DATA,
INCLUDING:
A. THE PROPORTION OF CRISES RESOLVED THROUGH A
DISCHARGE TO HOME; AND
B. THE PROPORTION OF CRISES RESOLVED THROUGH A
DISCHARGE TO A HIGHER LEVEL OF CARE;
[(i)] (II) [An] THROUGH AN annual survey by the Administration
of DATA OBTAINED FROM consumers and family members who have received services
from the Crisis Response System COLLECTED THROUGH ONGOING DATA COLLECTION
FROM 9–8–8 CALL, TEXT, AND CHAT PROVIDERS AND OTHER CRISIS PROVIDERS
THAT IS REPORTED ANNUALLY; and
[(ii)] (III) [Annual] THROUGH ANNUAL CRISIS SERVICES data
collection on the number of behavioral health calls received by police, attempted and
completed suicides, unnecessary hospitalizations, hospital diversions, arrests and
detentions of individuals with behavioral health diagnoses, and diversion of arrests and
detentions of individuals with behavioral health diagnoses INVOLVEMENT OF LAW
ENFORCEMENT, INVOLUNTARY STATUS OF CLIENTS, AND DIVERSION FROM HIGHER
LEVELS OF CARE, INCLUDING HOSPITALS.
(b) The data derived from the evaluation of outcomes of services required under
subsection (a)(3) of this section shall be:
(1) Collected, analyzed, and publicly reported [at least annually] ON OR
BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2026;
(2) Disaggregated by race, gender, age, and zip code; and
(3) Used to formulate policy recommendations with the goal of decreasing
criminal detention and improving crisis diversion programs and linkages to effective
community health services.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 659
(c) The Crisis Response System services shall be implemented as determined by
the Administration in collaboration with the core service agency or local behavioral health
authority serving each jurisdiction and community members of each jurisdiction.
(d) An advance directive for mental health services under § 5–602.1 of this article
shall apply to the delivery of services under this subtitle.
(e) This subtitle may not be construed to affect petitions for emergency
evaluations under § 10–622 of this title.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 5 –